Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-158
Boards; appointment; vacancy.

(1) The State Board of Health shall appoint members to the boards designated in section 38-167 except the Board of Emergency Medical Services.

(2) Any vacancy in the membership of a board caused by death, resignation, removal, or otherwise shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments are made.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 11, p. 457;

C.S.1929, § 71-301;

R.S.1943, § 71-111;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 451, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 31;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 23;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 13;

Laws 2001, LB 270, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-111;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 58;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 47.